District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.17

Rate proceeding; standard for rate structure.

(a)

Within 12 months of March 25, 1986, and at least once every 24 months thereafter, the Commission shall undertake a review of the taxicab rate structure. The review required by this section shall be undertaken by holding at least 1 public hearing, upon notice with opportunity to comment. Within 120 days of holding the public hearings, the panel shall render a decision on whether a modification or adjustment in rate structure is warranted, and, if determined to be warranted, shall implement the modification or adjustment.

(b)

The Commission, in the establishment and supervision of the taxicab rate structure, shall balance equitably the interest of owners and operators of taxicabs, taxicab companies and associations, and dispatch services in procuring a maximum rate of return on investment and labor against the public interest in maintaining a taxicab system affordable to a broad cross section of the public, and shall establish nondiscriminatory rates, charges, matrices, boundaries, and methodologies for the determination of taxicab fares which assure reasonable and adequate compensation and promote broad and nondiscriminatory public access to taxicab transportation facilities.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 18, 33 DCR 703
May 10, 1988, D.C. Law 7-109, § 2(g), 35 DCR 2181
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(o), 59 DCR 9431

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1717.
2001 Ed., § 50-317.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 substituted “Commission” for “Commission’s Panel on Rates and Rules” in (a) and for “panel and the full commission” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.